pl: Elektronika > Komputery > Komputery do gier: Komputery stacjonarne do gier; Laptopy do gier
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Υπολογιστές > Υπολογιστές για παιχνίδια: Επιτραπέζιοι υπολογιστές gaming; Φορητοί υπολογιστές gaming
hr-HR: Elektronika > Računala > Računala za igre: Gaming računala; Gaming prijenosna računala
nb: Elektronikk > Datamaskiner > Spilldatamaskiner: Stasjonære gaming-datamaskiner; Bærbare gaming-datamaskiner
en: Electronics > Computers > Gaming Computers: Gaming Desktops; Gaming Laptops
ko: 전자기기 > 컴퓨터 > 게임용 컴퓨터: 게이밍 데스크톱; 게이밍 노트북
bg-BG: Електроника > Компютри > Гейминг компютри: Геймърски настолни компютри; Геймърски лаптопи
sk-SK: Elektronika > Počítače > Herné počítače: Herné počítače; Herné notebooky
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 電腦 > 遊戲電腦: 電競桌上型電腦; 電競筆電
fr: Appareil électronique > Ordinateurs > Ordinateurs pour jeu: Ordinateurs de bureau pour jeu; Ordinateurs portables pour jeu
it: Elettronica > Computer > Computer per gaming: Computer desktop gaming; Laptop gaming
nl: Elektronica > Computers > Gamingcomputers: Gaming desktops; Gaming laptops
ro-RO: Electronice > Calculatoare > Calculatoare pentru jocuri: Desktopuri pentru gaming; Laptopuri pentru gaming
tr: Elektronik > Bilgisayarlar > Oyun Bilgisayarları: Oyuncu Masaüstü Bilgisayarlar; Oyuncu Dizüstü Bilgisayarlar
sl-SI: Elektronika > Računalniki > Gaming računalniki: Igralni namizni računalniki; Igralni prenosniki
hu: Elektronika > Számítógépek > Játékszámítógépek: Játék asztali számítógépek; Játék laptopok
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > คอมพิวเตอร์ > คอมพิวเตอร์สำหรับการเล่นเกม: คอมพิวเตอร์เดสก์ท็อปเกมมิ่ง; โน้ตบุ๊กเกมมิ่ง
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Computadores > PC gamer: Desktops para jogos; Notebooks para jogos
fi: Elektroniikka > Tietokoneet > Pelitietokoneet: Pelityöasemat; Pelikannettavat
es: Electrónica > Computadoras > Computadoras para videojuegos: Computadoras de escritorio para juegos; Laptops para juegos
da: Elektronik > Computere > Gamingcomputere: Gaming-computere; Bærbare gaming-computere
de: Elektronik > Computer > Gaming-Computer: Gaming-Desktop-Computer; Gaming-Laptops
lt-LT: Elektronika > Kompiuteriai > Žaidimų kompiuteriai: Žaidimų staliniai kompiuteriai; Žaidimų nešiojamieji kompiuteriai
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > Máy vi tính > Máy tính chơi game: Máy tính để bàn gaming; Laptop gaming
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 计算机 > 游戏电脑: 游戏台式机; 游戏笔记本电脑
cs: Elektronika > Počítače > Herní počítače: Herní stolní počítače; Herní notebooky
ru: Электроника > Компьютеры > Игровые компьютеры: Игровые настольные компьютеры; Игровые ноутбуки
sv: Elektronik > Datorer > Speldatorer: Gamingstationära datorer; Bärbara gamingdatorer
ja: 電子機器 > コンピューター > ゲーミングコンピューター: ゲーミングデスクトップPC; ゲーミングノートパソコン
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Computadores > Computadores para jogos: Desktops para gaming; Portáteis para gaming